Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-503
Organization; hearing on petition; notice; publication; boundaries of district.

Upon the filing of such petition in the office of the county board it shall give notice in one or more newspapers daily, if there be a daily paper in said county, during twenty days prior to such meeting, of the time and place where the petition will be heard. At the time so fixed the board shall meet, and all persons in such proposed sanitary district shall have opportunity to be heard touching the location and boundary of the proposed district. Thereupon the county board shall by an order determine the boundaries of such district, whether described in such petition or otherwise.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 1, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 1924;

C.S.1922, § 1865;

C.S.1929, § 31-603;

R.S.1943, § 31-503.